Hawaii statutes.
§457-1 Purpose. In order to safeguard
life and health, any person practicing or offering to practice as an advanced
practice registered nurse, a registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse in
this State for compensation shall be required to submit evidence that the
person is qualified to so practice, and shall be licensed as provided in this
chapter. It shall be unlawful for any person not licensed under this chapter
to practice or offer to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered
nurse, a registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse; or to use any sign,
card, or device, or in any manner indicate or imply that the person is an
advanced practice registered nurse, a registered nurse, or a licensed practical
nurse. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 119, §1; am L 2004, c 88, §1; am L
2014, c 46, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next